District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.90

Coverage.

(a)

The Agency shall offer:

(1)

Health centers medical malpractice insurance that is consistent with coverage offered in the market; and

(2)

Property insurance for the benefit of the District for District real property assets consistent with coverage offered in the market.

(b)

The insurance policies and coverage offered pursuant to this part shall be established by the Risk Officer with the advice of the Advisory Council and subject to the approval of the Commissioner.

(c)

Any policy offered by the Agency shall state that the liability of the Agency shall be limited to the funds in the Captive Trust Fund.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 11, 55 DCR 6261
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1032(g), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote this section.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(e) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-9, June 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6407, 20 DCSTAT 1277).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(e) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-39, March 20, 2013, 60 DCR 4663, 20 DCSTAT 523).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(e) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-85, June 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9536, 20 DCSTAT 1441).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(g) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(g) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 1031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Captive Insurance Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.